Utah statutes.
57-2-16.   Subpoena to subscribing witness.
Upon the application of any grantee in any conveyance required by law to be
recorded, or of any person claiming under such grantee, verified under the
oath of the applicant, that any witness to such conveyance residing in the
county where such application is made refuses to appear and testify touching
the execution thereof, and that such conveyance cannot be proved without his
evidence, any officer authorized to take the acknowledgment or proof of such
conveyance may issue a subpoena requiring such witness to appear before such
officer and testify touching the execution thereof.
